Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15.1 Water Supply Facilities

46-15.1-1.
Legislative declaration — Water resources board (corporate) — Applicable sections.

The findings and declarations made by §

46-15-1

are hereby made applicable to this chapter.

The water resources board (corporate) under this chapter constitutes a body politic and corporate and a public instrumentality of the state having a distinct legal existence from the state and not constituting a department of state government.

The following sections also apply to the water resources board, the state agency: §§

46-15.1-2(a)

,

46-15.1-2.2

,

46-15.2-3

,

46-15.1-2.4

,

46-15.1-4.1

, 46-15.1-5(15) — (25),

46-15.1-20

and

46-15.1-21

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 104, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 126, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 7; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 7.

46-15.1-1.1.
Repealed.

46-15.1-2.
Board created — Appointment of members.

There is hereby authorized, created and established a water resources board consisting of fifteen (15) members as follows:

Eleven (11) members shall represent the public and shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate as herein provided;

One of whom shall be a person who is actively engaged in the agricultural business, preferably an owner and/or operator of an agricultural business, with respect to which appointment the governor shall give due consideration to the recommendation of the Rhode Island Agricultural Council established pursuant to the provisions of chapter 3 of title 2;

One of whom shall be a representative of a conservation organization, with respect to which appointment the governor shall give due consideration to the recommendation of the Environment Council of Rhode Island;

One of whom shall be a professional with expertise in geology and/or hydrology;

One of whom shall be a professional with expertise in engineering with relevance to water supply;

One of whom shall be a professional with expertise in financial planning and/or investment;

One of whom shall be a professional with expertise in land and/or watershed management;

One of whom shall be a representative of a public water system that withdraws more than one hundred thousand (100,000) gallons per day, primarily from a surface water supply;

One of whom shall be a representative of a public water system that withdraws more than one hundred thousand (100,000) gallons per day, primarily from a ground water supply;

One of whom shall be a representative of a water user that withdraws more than one hundred thousand (100,000) gallons per day; and

Two (2) of whom shall be members of the general public.

No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board unless he or she is a resident of this state. The remaining four (4) members are the director of environmental management, the director of the Rhode Island commerce corporation, the associate director of the division of planning within the department of administration, and the director of the department of health.

Members shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified and shall be eligible to succeed themselves. In the month of February in each year, the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint successors to the public members of the board whose terms shall expire in such year, to hold office commencing on the day they are qualified and until the first day of March in the third year after their respective appointments and until their respective successors are appointed and qualified.

Those members of the board as of the effective date of this act shall continue to serve until their term expires or they resign, whether or not they meet the criteria set out in subsection (a);

Any vacancy which may occur in the board for a public member shall be filled by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, for the remainder of the unexpired term in the manner as prescribed in (a) of this subsection. Each ex officio member of the board may designate a subordinate within his or her department to represent him or her at all meetings of the board.

Members of the board shall be removable by the governor pursuant to §

36-1-7

of the general laws and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.

The water resources board is designated to carry out the provisions of this chapter. In exercising its powers under this chapter, the board constitutes a body politic and corporate and a public instrumentality of the state having a distinct legal existence from the state and not constituting a department of the state government. The board may take action under this chapter at any meeting of the board. A member of the board who is affiliated with a public water system in Rhode Island, as provided in §

46-15-2

, shall not thereby be disqualified from acting as a member of the board on a transaction under this chapter with a public water system. Upon the enactment of this chapter, and annually in the month of March thereafter, the board shall choose a treasurer to act as such under this chapter. The treasurer need not be a member of the board or of its staff and shall serve until his or her successor is chosen and takes office, unless sooner removed by the board with or without cause. In the event of a vacancy in the office of treasurer, the board shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.

Nothing contained herein shall be construed as terminating or discontinuing the existence of the water resources board as it exists prior to July 1, 1993, for purposes of chapters 15.1, 15.2, and 15.3 of this title, and the water resources board created hereby shall be and shall be deemed to be a continuation of the water resources board as it existed prior to July 1, 1993, for the purposes enumerated in chapters 15.1, 15.2, and 15.3 of this title. Nothing contained herein shall affect the bonding or financing authority of the water resources board as it exists prior to July 1, 1993, nor shall anything contained herein be construed as terminating, altering, discontinuing, or in any way impairing the bonding or financing power of the water resources board as it exists under chapters 15.1, 15.2, and 15.3 of this title prior to July 1, 1993.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 5; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 154; P.L. 2001, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 104, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 126, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 49; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 7; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 7.

46-15.1-2.2.
Qualifications of members.

Each public member of the board, before entering upon his or her duties, shall take an oath to administer the duties of his or her office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

No member of the board shall be in the employ of, or own any stock in, or be in any way directly or indirectly financially interested in any private corporation or company engaged in the supply, storage, distribution, or sale of water. No member shall, either personally or through a partner or agent, render any professional service or make or perform any business contract with or for any such corporation or company; nor shall any member, directly or indirectly, receive a commission, bonus, discount, present, or reward from any such corporation or company; provided, however, that the limitation set forth herein shall not apply in the case of those public members affiliated with public water systems who receive directors’ fees or other payments for their services with a public water system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 6.

46-15.1-2.3.
Officers of the board — Quorum and vote required for action.

Forthwith, and upon the enactment of this chapter, and annually in the month of March, thereafter, the board shall elect one of its public members as chairperson, one of its public members as vice chairperson, and shall also elect a secretary either from its membership or its technical staff. The board may elect from among its members such other officers as it deems necessary. Nine (9) voting members of the board constitutes a quorum. A majority vote of those present and voting shall be required for action. No vacancy in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all of the rights and perform all of the duties of the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 6; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 104, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 126, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 288, § 7; P.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 7.

46-15.1-2.4.
Compensation of members.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation.

The members of the board may also be reimbursed for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 6; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 21, § 33; P.L. 2006, ch. 104, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 126, § 2.

46-15.1-3.
Repealed.

46-15.1-4.
Purposes.

The purposes of the water resources board under this chapter shall be to carry out the powers and duties of the board set forth in this chapter, including, without limitation, to establish water supply facilities and lease those facilities to cities, towns, districts, and other municipal, quasi municipal or private corporations or companies engaged in the water supply business in Rhode Island, or contract for the use of the facilities by the parties, or sell to those parties the water derived from, carried by, or processed in the facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 80, § 6; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 5.

46-15.1-4.1.
“Water supply facilities” defined.

The phrase
“water supply facilities”
wherever appearing in this chapter and chapter 15 of this title means water reservoirs, wells and well sites, treatment, transmission or distribution systems, stream gauging stations, any and all real estate or interests in real estate held in connection with those, all equipment and improvements held in connection with those, and any and all other property or interests in them, real, personal or mixed, used or held to be used in connection with those.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 56, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 336, § 1.

46-15.1-5.
Powers.

The board shall carry out its functions and shall have the following powers:

To adopt a seal and to alter the seal from time to time;

To sue and be sued;

To purchase, hold, and dispose of real and personal property, or interests therein, and to lease the property as lessee or lessor;

To make or cause to be made such surveys and borings as it may deem necessary;

To engage engineering, legal, accounting, and other professional services;

To make contracts;

To employ personnel and fix their rates of compensation;

To borrow money and issue its bonds and notes as hereinafter provided;

To apply and contract for and to expend assistance from the United States or other sources, whether in the form of a grant or loan or otherwise;

To adopt and amend bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business;

To invest or deposit funds in demand deposits, savings deposits, and time deposits in any bank or trust company which is a member of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or in any obligations issued or guaranteed by the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or as provided in §

35-10-11

;

To establish, operate, and maintain or lease to others, or contract with others for the use of, such water supply facilities as may be reasonably required for the fulfillment of its purposes;

To purchase and sell water;

To exercise such other powers as may be necessary or incidental to the exercise of the foregoing powers or to the accomplishment of the purposes of the board;

To acquire, within the limitation of funds therefor, the sites, appurtenant marginal lands, dams, waters, water rights, rights of way, easements, and other property in interests in property for reservoirs, groundwater wells, well sites, and for such pipe lines, aqueducts, pumping stations, filtration plants, and auxiliary structures as may be necessary or desirable for the treatment and distribution of water from those reservoirs, groundwater wells, and well sites. Lands acquired under the provisions of this section shall be acquired with the approval of the governor by purchase, gift, devise, or otherwise on such terms and conditions as the board shall determine, or by the exercise of eminent domain, in accordance with the provisions of chapter 6 of title 37, as amended, insofar as those provisions are consistent with the provisions hereof;

To construct or purchase water reservoirs, wells and well sites, processing facilities, transmission or distribution systems, and other facilities, including existing facilities of municipal water agencies or departments, special water districts, or private water companies, necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter and to implement its plans and program;

To acquire the assets, assume the liabilities, or to effect the merger into itself of any corporation or other organization, including public or private water supply systems incorporated or organized under the laws of this state, which corporation or organization has as its principal business the establishment of water supply facilities or provision of related services, all upon such terms and for such consideration as the board shall deem to be appropriate;

To lease, sell, or otherwise convey any reservoir sites or other water supply or distribution facilities acquired, constructed, or purchased by the board to any municipal water agency or department or special water district or private water company, upon such terms as the board shall deem appropriate;

To provide for cooperative development, conservation, and use of water resources by the state, municipal agencies or departments, special water districts or privately owned water systems, the board may:

Authorize publicly or privately owned water supply agencies to build structures or install equipment on land owned or leased by the board.

Enter into contracts with publicly or privately owned water supply agencies for operation of any facilities owned or leased by the board or operate any such facility by itself.

To enter into contracts to supply raw or processed water to publicly or privately owned water supply agencies, which shall be approved as to substance by the director of administration and as to form by the attorney general;

To review all plans and proposals for construction or installation of facilities for water supply in accordance with the applicable sections of chapter 15 of this title;

To make loans to publicly owned water supply agencies for acquisition, construction, and renovation of water supply facilities from funds which may be appropriated for this purpose by the general assembly, from bonds issued for this purpose, or from other funds which may become available to the board for this purpose;

To borrow money temporarily from the water development fund, for the purposes of this chapter, and to implement its plans and programs relating to reservoir development, exclusive of the acquisition of sites for the development of surface reservoirs, in anticipation of revenue or federal aid;

To enter into contracts and/or agreements with such departments, divisions, agencies, or boards of the state as are directed by the governor to regulate, manage, or perform related functions on any lands or waters acquired under the provisions of the Big River — Wood River Reservoir Site Acquisition Act (P.L. of 1964, chapter 133); and

To compensate the departments, divisions, agencies, or boards from the water development fund in an amount equal to the cost of providing the functions or services as are directed to be performed by the governor. The compensation shall be mandatory and shall be provided according to procedures established by the department of administration.

The board as a body politic and corporate and public instrumentality created pursuant to this chapter is subject to § 46-15.1-5(1) — (25). The board as the state agency pursuant to chapter 15 of this title is subject to § 46-15.1-5(15) — (25).

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 80, § 7; P.L. 1990, ch. 461, § 5; P.L. 1999, ch. 461, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 49.

46-15.1-5.1.
Powers in support of the Rhode Island rivers council.

Upon the request of the Rhode Island rivers council, the board may exercise any powers set forth in §

46-15.1-5

on behalf of the Rhode Island rivers council in order to accomplish the purposes of the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 159, § 3; P.L. 2004, ch. 254, § 3.

46-15.1-5.2.
Duties of the board.

The board shall have the following additional duties:

Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the board (corporate) shall submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall provide:

A summary of the board’s (corporate) meetings including when the board (corporate) met, subjects addressed, and decisions rendered; a summary of the board’s (corporate) actions including a listing of entities for which water supply facilities were established, leased, contracted for the use of, or which received water sold from such facilities; bonds and notes issued; grants or loans applied or contracted for; funds invested or deposited; assets acquired; assets sold, leased, or conveyed to municipal water agencies, departments, special water districts, or private water companies; contracts entered into to supply raw or processed water; trust agreements entered into with corporate trustees; actions taken in support of the work of the Rhode Island Rivers Council; a synopsis of any law suits or other legal matters related to the authority of the board (corporate); a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended by the board (corporate) including the source of the funds; a listing of the staff and/or consultants employed by the board (corporate); a summary of performance during the previous fiscal year including accomplishments, shortcomings and remedies; and a listing of findings and recommendation derived from board (corporate) activities.

The report shall be posted electronically on the general assembly and the secretary of state’s website as prescribed in §

42-20-8.2

. The director of the department of administration shall be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this section.

The board shall conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members and new designees of ex-officio members within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the general manager, approved by the board, and conducted by the general manager. The board may approve the use of any board or staff members or other individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the following areas: the provisions of chapters 46-13, 46-14, 46-15, 46-15.1, 46-15.2, 46-15.3, 46-15.4, 46-15.5, 46-15.6, 46-15.7, 42-46, 38-2 and 36-14; and the board’s rules and regulations.

The director of the department of administration shall, within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this act [June 16, 2006], prepare and disseminate training materials relating to the provisions of chapters 42-46, 36-14 and 38-2.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 104, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 126, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 49.

46-15.1-6.
Purchase or lease from state.

The state properties committee is authorized on behalf of the state, from time to time, to sell and convey or lease to the board, for the purposes of this chapter, any property (which may include water sources or the right to take water) held by the state for water supply purposes, or any interest therein. Any such sale of property shall be for fair market value as determined by the board and the state properties committee. Any such lease shall be for a term not exceeding fifty (50) years and shall be for such fair rental value as may be set forth in the lease or determined in accordance with the lease.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1.

46-15.1-7.
Purchases from and leases, pledges and sales to others.

Any city, town, district, or other municipal, quasi municipal, or public or private corporation or company engaged in the water supply business in Rhode Island is authorized, from time to time, to sell or otherwise convey to the board any water supply facilities held by that entity, and to lease from the board with or without an option to purchase, or contract with the board for the use of any water supply facilities, or any interest therein, held by the board under this chapter, or to contract to purchase water to be supplied by the board under this chapter. Any city, town, district, or other municipal, quasi municipal, or public or private corporation or company engaged in the water supply business in Rhode Island and constituting a “public utility” within the meaning of §

39-1-2(a)(20)

is further authorized to pledge to the board water fees and charges. The provisions of any other laws or ordinances, general, special, or local, or of any rule or regulation of the state or any municipality, or of any municipal charter provision, restricting or regulating in any manner the power of the state or any municipality to lease (as lessee or lessor) or sell or convey property, real, personal, or mixed, or to pledge water fees and charges shall not apply to leases and sales made with the board pursuant to this chapter.

Any city, town, district, or other municipal, quasi municipal, or public or private corporation or company which so leases water facilities from the board, or so contracts with the board for the use thereof, is authorized, from time to time, to contract with any other public or private water system for the purchase or sale of water to be conveyed or processed through or in such facilities, and the latter is similarly authorized to enter into a contract with the former.

Any lease, pledge agreement or contract under this section shall be for a term not exceeding fifty (50) years. A lease, pledge agreement, or contract may be made by a city, town, or district hereunder, either prior or subsequent to the making of any appropriations which may be needed to carry out the obligations of the city, town, or district under the lease, pledge agreement, or contract. Any such lease, pledge agreement, or contract shall provide for cooperative undertakings between the city, town or district and the board regarding the construction or installation of facilities for water supply being financed.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of any other laws or ordinances, general, special or local, or of any rule or regulation of the state or any municipality, or any municipal charter provision, restricting in any manner the power of a municipality to incur debt, the obligations of any city, town, or district, under any lease, pledge agreement or contract shall not be considered indebtedness within the meaning of any limitation of indebtedness or of any provision relating to the manner of authorizing or incurring indebtedness.

Pledges or grants of security interests by a city, town or district hereunder shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge or grant in security interest is made; the water fees and charges or other monies so pledged and then held or thereafter received by such city, town or district shall be immediately subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof, or further act; and the lien of any such pledge or grant of a security interest shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against such city, town or district, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof.

The agreement by which a pledge or grant of a security interest is created need not be filed or recorded except in the records of the board, and no filing need be made under the Uniform Commercial Code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 80, § 8; P.L. 1986, ch. 56, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 49.

46-15.1-8.
Funds.

Except as otherwise provided by the board, the funds of the board under this chapter shall be in the custody of the treasurer of the board. The fiscal year of the board under this chapter shall end on June 30 of each calendar year. All payments by the board under this chapter shall be made solely from the funds derived by the board from the exercise of its powers under this chapter. Payments to the state hereunder, in the nature of current expenses, shall be a first charge on the revenues of the project or projects to which the payments relate, and on such other funds as may be available hereunder to pay the current expenses of the project or projects. Payments to the state hereunder in the nature of capital costs shall be a first charge on the proceeds of bonds or notes issued by the board to finance the project or projects to which the payments relate, and on such other funds as may be available hereunder to pay the capital costs of the project or projects. A sale shall not be made by the state to the board under §

46-15.1-6

unless the necessary funds are available to pay the purchase price upon the conveyance.

The board may expend for any corporate purpose hereunder such sums as may be advanced to the board for the purpose by the state or by any city, town, district, or other municipal or quasi municipal or public or private corporation or company engaged in the water supply business, and each of those entities (other than the state) is authorized to make advances to the board in connection with any project or proposed project in which it is interested. Each advance by the state shall be repaid as provided in the foregoing paragraph. Each advance by any other entity shall be repaid to the extent and subject to the terms specified in or otherwise agreed at the time of the advance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1.

46-15.1-9.
Temporary borrowing.

The board may borrow money temporarily for the purposes of this chapter and chapter 15.3 of this title in anticipation of revenue or federal aid or in anticipation of the issue of bonds, and issue notes therefor. Notes issued in anticipation of revenue may not mature or be refunded beyond one year from the date of their original issue, and notes issued in anticipation of federal aid or of the issue of bonds may not mature or be refunded beyond five (5) years from the date of their original issue. Notes shall be payable solely from such funds as are derived under this chapter or chapter 15.3 of this title and provided for payment under the applicable trust agreement or resolution described in §

46-15.1-11

, and shall contain a statement to this effect on their face.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 4.

46-15.1-10.
Bonds.

The board may borrow money for capital purposes under this chapter and for the purposes of chapter 15.3 of this title and issue its bonds therefor. Those purposes may include all costs (whether incurred prior to or after the issue of bonds or notes hereunder) of purchase or lease of property, site development, construction, improvement, enlargement, reconstruction, alteration, equipment, furnishings, demolition, or removal of existing buildings or structures (including the cost of purchasing or leasing any lands to which those buildings or structures may be moved), financing charges, interest prior to and during the carrying out of any project, interest for up to one year after the completion or estimated completion date of any project, planning, engineering, and legal services, administrative expenses, the funding of notes issued by the board for those purposes, the refinancing of bonds or notes issued by any city, town, district or other municipal, quasi municipal, or public corporation for those purposes, the reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses as may be required by a trust agreement or resolution securing notes or bonds, and all other expenses incidental to the determination of the feasibility of any project or to carrying out the project or to placing the project in operation.

Bonds shall be payable solely from such funds as are derived under this chapter or chapter 15.3 of this title including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, revenues derived from pledges of water fees and charges from leasing any water supply facilities to any city, town, district, or other municipal, quasi municipal or public or private corporation or company engaged in the water supply business in Rhode Island, or water quality protection charges imposed under chapter 15.3 of this title, or funds in the watershed protection fund established under chapter 15.3 of this title and provided for payment under the applicable trust agreement or resolution described in §

46-15.1-11

, and shall contain a statement to this effect on their face.

The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from their dates of issue, as may be determined by the board, and may be made redeemable before maturity at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the board prior to the issue of the bonds. The board shall determine the form of the bonds, including interest coupons to be attached thereto, and the manner of their execution, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of the principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds shall bear the seal of the board or a facsimile thereof.

In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds, coupons, or notes issued by the board shall cease to be an officer before the delivery thereof, the signature or the facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer had remained in office until after the delivery.

The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the board may determine, the provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. The board may sell its bonds and notes in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price, as it may determine will best effect the purposes of this chapter.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the board may issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when those bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The board may also provide for the replacement of any bonds, notes, or coupons which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost.

Bonds and notes may be issued under this chapter without obtaining the consent of any other department, division, commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, or things which are specifically required by this chapter for the issue of those bonds or notes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 1.

46-15.1-11.
Pledge of revenues and other funds.

In the discretion of the board, any bonds or notes issued by it may be secured by a trust agreement between the board and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank whose principal office is within or without the state. The trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issue of the bonds or notes may pledge or assign, in whole or in part, the revenues and other moneys held or to be received by the board under this chapter or chapter 15.3 of this title, and may convey, mortgage, or grant or assign a security interest in any water supply facilities pledge agreement or lease thereof in connection with which those bonds shall have been authorized.

The trust agreement or resolution may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders or noteholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including provisions defining defaults and providing for remedies in the event thereof (which may include the acceleration of maturities), and covenants setting forth the duties of, and limitations on, the board in acting under this chapter in relation to the purchase or leasing of property, construction, improvement, enlargement, alteration, equipping, furnishing, maintenance, operation, repair, insurance, and disposition of property, the custody, safeguarding, investment, and application of monies, the issue of additional bonds or notes, the fixing, revision, and collection of rates and rents, the use of any surplus bond or note proceeds, the establishment of reserves, and the making and amending of leases, pledge agreements and contracts.

The board is authorized to fix, revise, and collect rates and rents for water furnished by it or facilities leased by it to others. The rates and rents shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any other commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state or of any municipality or other political subdivision of the state, but the rates and rents shall be subject to the terms of any applicable contracts and leases.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company to act as a depository or trustee of the proceeds of bonds or notes or of revenues or other moneys under any such trust agreement or resolution, and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the board. The trust agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders or noteholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders or noteholders. In addition to the foregoing, the trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the board may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders or noteholders.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of the trust agreement or resolution may be treated as part of the board’s cost of operation and maintenance under this chapter.

The pledge or mortgage or grant of a security interest by the trust agreement or resolution shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge or mortgage or grant of a security interest is made; the revenues or other moneys so pledged and then held or thereafter received by the board shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act; and the lien of any such pledge or mortgage or grant of a security interest shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the board, irrespective of whether the parties have notice thereof.

Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge or mortgage or grant of a security interest is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the board, and no filing need be made under the Uniform Commercial Code.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 56, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 417, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 468, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 49.

46-15.1-12.
Trust funds.

All money received by the board under this chapter, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds or notes or as revenues or otherwise, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1.

46-15.1-13.
Remedies.

Any holder of bonds or notes issued under this chapter or of any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under a trust agreement or resolution securing the same, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by the trust agreement or resolution, may bring suit upon the bonds, notes, or coupons and may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the state or granted hereunder or under the trust agreement or resolution, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this chapter or by the trust agreement or resolution to be performed by the board or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, revising, and collecting of rates and rents. The court may appoint a receiver in any such proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1.

46-15.1-14.
Exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this chapter shall be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, and for the improvement of their health and living conditions, and the purchase, lease, operation, and maintenance of projects by the board under this chapter will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions. The board shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon any property acquired or used by the board hereunder or upon its income, existence, or franchise hereunder, and the bonds and notes issued by the board hereunder and the interest thereon shall be exempt from taxation in the state. Sales to the board hereunder shall not be subject to any sales or similar tax, and the use of property by the board hereunder shall not be subject to any use or similar tax. The lease of property of the board to others hereunder for water supply purposes, contracts for the use by others, and the use thereof by the lessees or others contracting with the board, shall not be subject to any sales, use, or similar tax, and the lessees or other users under the contracts shall not be required to pay any property taxes or assessments on the property except as provided below.

Except as to property leased to others, the board shall pay annually from its revenues hereunder, after first providing for debt service and other expenses and reserve requirements required by an applicable trust agreement or bond or note resolution to be met from current revenues, to each city, town, or district, a sum of money, in lieu of property taxes on its property hereunder, equal to any property tax levied on the property by the city, town, or district during the year next preceding the acquisition of the property by the board. As to property leased to others, the lessee shall pay such amount, except to the extent that provision is made in the lease for payment by the board, under the terms set forth in the foregoing sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 304, § 1.